Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 4 Wages

Cross references. —

As to definition of “wage,” in connection with unemployment compensation, see §

27-3-102

.

As to salaries of state officers and employees and as to limitation on salaries not fixed by statute, see §

9-3-101

et seq.

For salary provisions applying to the various forms of cities, see §§

15-3-205

,

15-4-105

and

15-4-202

.

As to maximum and minimum salaries for firemen and policemen, see §

15-5-106

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

27 Am. Jur. 2d Employment §§ 77 to 118; 48 Am. Jur. 2d Labor and Labor Relations §§ 2561 to 2608.

Portal-to-Portal Act, 3 ALR2d 1097, 21 ALR2d 1327, Fair Labor Standards Act, 26 ALR Fed 607.

Running of statute of limitations against claim for services rendered over extended period under indefinite employment not fixing time of payment, 7 ALR2d 198.

What constitutes change of position by payee-servant so as to preclude recovery of payment made under mistake, 40 ALR2d 997.

Construction of “net profits,” “earnings” or the like, in provision for profit-sharing bonus of corporate employees, 49 ALR2d 1129.

Employee's right with respect to compensation where he continues in employer's service after termination of contract for definite term, 53 ALR2d 384.

Recovery back by employer of compensation paid to employee as result of mistake or the employee's fraud, 88 ALR2d 1437.

Garnishment of salary, wages or commissions where defendant debtor is indebted to garnishee-employer, 93 ALR2d 995.

Personal liability of servant or agent for advances or withdrawals in excess of commissions earned, bonus or share of profits, 32 ALR3d 802.

Rights and obligations under employer-employee suggestion plans, 40 ALR3d 1416.

Modern status as to duration of employment where contract specifies no term but fixes daily or longer compensation, 93 ALR3d 659.

Sufficiency of notice of modification in terms of compensation of at-will employee who continues performance to bind employee, 69 ALR4th 1145.

What contracts are subject to wage and hour requirements of Walsh-Healey Act (41 USC sec. 35), 2 ALR Fed 637.

Statute designed to prevent discrimination between male and female employees as regards wages, 7 ALR Fed 707.

Liquidated damages for violation of wage and hour provisions of Fair Labor Standards Act, 26 ALR Fed 607.

Determination of exempt status under overtime pay provisions of the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USC §§ 207(a)(1), 213(a)(1)), of managerial employees who performed nonexempt work during strike, 60 ALR Fed 250.

Employee's protection under § 15(a)(3) of Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USC § 215(a)(3)), 101 ALR Fed 220.

30 C.J.S. Employer — Employee Relationship §§ 132 to 180.